Hawaii statutes.
§480-6 Refusal to deal. No person
shall refuse to sell any commodity to, or to buy any commodity from, any other
person or persons, when the refusal is for the purpose of compelling or
inducing the other person or persons to agree to or engage in acts which, if
acceded to, are prohibited by other sections of this chapter. [L 1961, c 190,
§4; Supp, §205A-4; HRS §480-6]

Case Notes

Preempted by federal labor regulations. 687 F. Supp. 1453.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next